Louisiana, session 2026, HB1086.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:707.2(A), (C)(1) and (2), and (D) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 32:702(18), 705(B)(6) and (7), 707.2(I) and (J), 707.2.1, and 707.2.2 are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§702. Definitions
As used in this Chapter:
* * *
(18) "Certificate of title" means the record that is evidence of ownership of
a motor vehicle, whether paper or electronic, issued by the department.
* * *
§705. Acceptance and delivery of certificate
* * *
Page 1 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2136 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1086
B. For purposes of this Section, an "endorsement" means one of the
following:
* * *
(6) The electronic signature of the seller affixed to an electronic record of
assignment or transfer of title in a manner authorized by the department, consistent
with the provisions of the Louisiana Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, R.S.
9:2601 et seq. The electronic signatures shall comply with the Identity Assurance
Level 2 (IAL2) security standard as defined in the National Institute of Standards and
Technology Special Publication 800-63A.
(7) An electronic signature of the seller affixed through an electronic titling
system or other electronic process approved by the department, which shall have the
same force and effect as a handwritten signature and endorsement executed pursuant
to Paragraph (1) or (2) of this Subsection.
* * *
§707.2. Electronic media system for lien recordation and title information; fees;
required bond; confidentiality of information; rules and regulations
A.(1) The department shall develop and implement on a statewide basis no
later than January 1, 2010, a computer system which will permit the electronic
recording of information concerning the perfection and release of vehicle security
interests without submitting or receiving paper title documents, including electronic
lien, electronic titling, and electronic registration. The department may shall allow
the submission of vehicle title information for new, transferred, and corrected
certificates of title, including the perfection and release of security interests, through
electronic media means in a cost-effective manner in lieu of the submission and
maintenance of paper documents otherwise required by this Chapter. The system
shall enable the ability to transact, process, record, and transmit certificates of title
through a completely electronic process for:
(a) All business entities and their service providers applying for automotive
titles and registrations, for itself or the customers.
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2136 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1086
(b) Electronic submission of liens and lien satisfactions by financial
institutions and its service providers pursuant to R.S. 32:708.
(2) The electronic lien, electronic titling, and electronic registration system
shall provide that any lien or security pursuant to R.S. 32:708 shall be electronically
transmitted to the department based on the following:
(a) If there are one or more liens or encumbrances on the motor vehicle, the
department shall electronically transmit the lien to the first lienholder and notify the
first lienholder of any additional liens, provided that a motor vehicle lien is noted on
the face of the certificate of title and notwithstanding any other requirements in this
Chapter.
(i) Subsequent lien satisfactions shall be electronically transmitted to the
department and shall include the name and address of the person satisfying the lien.
(ii) A certificate of title shall not be issued until the last lien is satisfied and
there is a clear certificate of title that can be issued to the owner of the vehicle. The
department is not obligated to print a paper title until the final lien is satisfied, except
where specifically requested by a dealer or financial institution to fulfill its business
requirements. A paper certificate of title shall be issued only upon request of the
vehicle owner or lienholder and upon payment of any applicable fees established by
the department.
(b)(i) Vehicles subject to an electronic lien shall have the certificate of title
for the vehicle considered to be physically held by the lienholder for the purpose of
compliance with state and federal odometer disclosure requirements.
(ii) A duly certified copy of the office of motor vehicle's electronic record
of the lien shall be admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding in
this state as evidence of the existence of a lien.
* * *
C.(1) An approved public license tag agent operating a secured host
computer system interfacing with the computer system of the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, and the computer system of a
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2136 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1086
lending institution or other sales finance company shall be bonded in an amount
specified by the department. The public license tag agent is hereby authorized to
charge a fee to customers utilizing this electronic media system.
(2) Each federally insured depository institution that originates more than
two hundred fifty twenty-five motor vehicle transactions per year, and each finance
company, lending institution, or other lender shall designate a public tag agent with
which such bank, finance company, lending institution, or other lender shall interface
its computer system for the purpose of receiving electronic confirmation from the
department, of the receipt and the filing of the security interest on the subject motor
vehicle. Each federally insured depository institution that originates more than two
hundred fifty twenty-five motor vehicle transactions per year, and each finance
company, lending institution, or other lender shall also designate such public tag
agent when transmitting a release or satisfaction of its lien.
* * *
D. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a written or printed report
of an electronic media transaction or recording required under the provisions of this
Section, if certified as true and correct by the department, shall serve as evidence of
any signature, acknowledgment, or information which was provided to or by the
department through electronic means, and the certification shall be admissible in any
legal proceeding as evidence of the facts stated therein.
* * *
I. Lienholders shall process electronic lien releases within two business days
from the date the funds are deemed collected and shall maintain real-time accuracy
of status information.
J. Beginning twelve months after the effective date on which the office of
motor vehicles certifies that the electronic lien, electronic titling, and electronic
registration functionality is available for use by all licensed motor vehicle dealers
statewide, each motor vehicle dealer licensed pursuant to R.S. 32:1251 et seq., shall
submit all applications for certificates of title, registration, and other ownership
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2136 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1086
transfer documents through the electronic lien, electronic titling, and electronic
registration system, unless contrary to any other provision of law or provided by rule
of the department.
§707.2.1. Electronic signatures and records for motor vehicle transactions
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any document,
record, or instrument required in connection with the sale, lease, transfer, titling,
registration, or financing of a motor vehicle, unless otherwise exempted by this
Section shall be created, executed, transmitted, and stored electronically, including
but not limited to the following:
(1) Titling documents.
(2) Registration applications.
(3) Odometer disclosures.
(4) Secure and limited powers of attorney.
(5) Electronic attestations.
B.(1) Any documents used to transfer ownership of a vehicle to an insurance
company after payment of damages may be signed electronically and reproduced in
paper form and shall not require notarization. The supporting documents include but
are not limited to the following:
(a) Limited powers of attorney.
(b) Applications for duplicate titles.
(c) Odometer disclosure forms.
(2) Electronic signatures shall comply with the Identity Assurance Level 2
(IAL2) security standard as defined in the National Institute of Standards and
Technology Special Publication 800-63A.
C.(1) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall accept electronic records and electronic signatures for the documents
and records identified in Subsection A of this Section and any electronic signature
or electronic record accepted by the department pursuant to this Section shall have
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2136 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1086
the same force and effect as an original written document or handwritten signature
and shall satisfy any legal requirement for a written record or signature.
(2) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act as may be necessary to implement the
provisions of this Section, including but not limited to rules governing:
(a) Electronic signatures and authentication standards.
(b) Security and identity verification procedures.
D. An electronic signature that is authenticated in a manner approved by the
department shall satisfy any requirement for a written signature and shall not require
notarization.
E. An electronically signed, or a legibly scanned or imaged copy thereof,
shall have the same force and effect as an original paper document bearing a
handwritten signature and shall be admissible for all legal and evidentiary purposes
to the same extent as the original paper document.
F.(1) A dealer or authorized officer as set forth in R.S. 32:702 using an
approved system in good faith and without actual knowledge of fraud or
unauthorized access shall be immune from civil liability arising solely from the use
of electronic signatures, remote notarization of powers of attorney or electronic
records, including claims alleging improper execution, authentication, or
transmission, provided the dealer complied with the requirements of this Section and
any rules promulgated by the department.
(2) The immunity provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not
apply to intentional misconduct or gross negligence.
§707.2.2. Secure digital motor vehicle titles
A. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall implement a system that offers vehicle title holders a fully paperless,
secure digital vehicle title that may be issued in lieu of a paper certificate of title.
B. Once implemented, the secure digital title system shall:
(1) Include all functions related to title reassignments.
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2136 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1086
(2) Meet or exceed applicable security requirements as set forth in
regulations promulgated by the department.
(3) Provide title holders with online, real-time access to motor vehicle titles
and status of titles in process.
C. A secure digital vehicle title produced under this Section shall be regarded
as an official title from the state of Louisiana and be fully recognized legally for any
motor vehicle related transactions within the state and all other United States
jurisdictions.
D. The secure digital title system shall permit the electronic transfer,
reassignment, and recording of ownership of a motor vehicle. Ownership transfers
executed through an approved electronic title system shall have the same legal effect
as transfers executed through a paper certificate of title. Licensed motor vehicle
dealers may complete title assignments, reassignments of ownership, and related
documents through the electronic system without requiring issuance of a paper
certificate of title.
E. A duly certified copy of the office of motor vehicle's secure digital title
shall be admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding in this state
as evidence of the existence of the title.
F. The commissioner of the office of motor vehicles shall promulgate any
rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 32:707.2(G) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act establishing or requiring the use of electronic
lien and title services, electronic registration and titling, secure digital motor vehicle titles,
or other electronic titling and registration transactions shall not become effective until the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, certifies that a fully
operational statewide electronic lien, electronic titling, and electronic registration system has
been implemented.
Section 4. The provisions of R.S. 32:705(B)(6) and (7) and R.S. 32:707.2.1 shall
become effective on January 1, 2028, or when the Department of Public Safety and
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2136 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1086
Corrections, office of motor vehicles, electronic vehicle and registration system is updated
to comply with the statutory provisions contained in this Act, whichever occurs first.
Nothing in this Section shall be construed to invalidate or limit any electronic record,
electronic signature, or electronic transaction otherwise authorized by law or by policy of
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, prior to the
effective date of this Section.
Section 5. All other provisions shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
Section 6. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof, is held invalid,
such invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications of the Act which can
be given effect without the invalid provision, item, or application and to this end the
provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 7. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
arrange in alphabetical order and renumber the definitions provided in R.S. 32:702.